West Virginia, session 2026, HB4663.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 7. LICENSES TO PRIVATE CLUBS. §60-7-8c. Special license for a multi-vendor private fair and festival; license fee and application; license subject to provisions of article; exception. [Repealed.] Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home